Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 2 Composition of House of Representatives
The sixty-fourth representative district shall consist of all of the part of the city of East Providence bounded by a line beginning at Veterans Memorial Pkwy and S Broadway; thence northerly on S Broadway to Martin St; thence easterly on Martin St to Maxfield Ave; thence southerly on Maxfield Ave to Hazard Ave; thence easterly on Hazard Ave to Pawtucket Ave; thence northerly on Pawtucket Ave to I-195; thence westerly on I-195 to Broadway; thence northerly on Broadway to N Broadway; thence northerly on N Broadway to Central Ave; thence northwesterly on Central Ave to Massasoit Ave; thence northeasterly on Massasoit Ave to Dexter Rd; thence northwesterly on Dexter Rd to the railroad tracks; thence northeasterly on the railroad tracks to Omega Pond; thence northwesterly on Omega Pond to New York New Haven and Hartford RR; thence northerly on the New York New Haven and Hartford RR to the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line to the Seekonk River; thence southerly on the Seekonk River to the Providence — East Providence boundary line; thence southerly on the Providence — East Providence boundary line to the line extending from Watchemoket Cove; thence northerly on the line extending from Watchemoket Cove to Veterans Memorial Pkwy; thence southeasterly on Veterans Memorial Pkwy to the point of origin.

The sixty-fourth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at I-95 and Prospect St; thence southeasterly on Prospect St to census block 440070171003019 and the utility right of way; thence northeasterly on the utility right of way to the railroad tracks; thence southerly on the railroad tracks to the Pawtucket — East Providence Boundary line; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line to the Seekonk River; thence northerly on the Seekonk River to I-95; thence northeasterly on I-95 to the point of origin.

Sixty-fifth district:
The sixty-fifth representative district shall consist of all of the part of the city of East Providence bounded by a line beginning at Veterans Memorial Pkwy and S Broadway; thence northeasterly on S Broadway to Martin St; thence easterly on Martin St to Maxfield Ave; thence southerly on Maxfield Ave to Hazard Ave; thence easterly on Hazard Ave to Pawtucket Ave; thence northerly on Pawtucket Ave to I-195; thence easterly on I-195 to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to Mink St; thence southerly on Mink St to Wampanoag Trl; thence southerly on Wampanoag Trl to Socony Rd; thence westerly on Socony Rd to census block 440070105024012; thence southwesterly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440070105024012 to census block 440070105024016; thence southerly on the western boundary line of census block 440070105024016 to Willett Ave; thence southeasterly on Willett Ave to Crescent View Ave; thence southwesterly on Crescent View Ave to Bullocks Cove; thence southerly on the shoreline to the East Providence — Barrington boundary line; thence southerly on the East Providence — Barrington boundary line to the Warwick — East Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Warwick — East Providence boundary line to the Cranston — East Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Cranston — East Providence boundary line to the Providence — East Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Providence — East Providence boundary line to the line extending from Watchemoket Cove; thence northerly on the line extending from Watchemoket Cove to Veterans Memorial Pkwy; thence southeasterly on Veterans Memorial Pkwy to the point of origin.

Sixty-sixth district:
The sixty-sixth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Barrington bounded by a line beginning at Hundred Acre Cove and the East Providence — Barrington boundary line; thence southwesterly on the East Providence — Barrington boundary line to the East Providence — Barrington — Warwick boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Barrington — Warwick boundary line to Nayatt Point Lighthouse; thence easterly on the shoreline to the line extending from Watson Ave; thence northerly on the line extending from Watson Ave to Watson Ave; thence northerly on Watson Ave to Nayatt Rd; thence easterly on Nayatt Rd to Rumstick Rd; thence southerly on Rumstick Rd to Ferry Ln; thence easterly on Ferry Ln to Owings Stone Rd; thence northerly on Owings Stone Rd to Mathewson Ln; thence northerly on Mathewson Ln to Mathewson Rd; thence northerly on Mathewson Rd to County Rd; thence northwesterly on County Rd to Maple Ave; thence westerly on Maple Ave to Centennial Ave; thence northerly on Centennial Ave to Foote St; thence easterly on Foote St to Princes Hill Ave; thence northerly on Princes Hill Ave to County Rd; thence northwesterly on County Rd to Massasoit Ave; thence easterly on Massasoit Ave to the Barrington River; thence northwesterly on the Barrington River to Hundred Acre Cove; thence northerly on Hundred Acre Cove to the point of origin.

The sixty-sixth representative district shall also consist of all of the part of the city of East Providence bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the East Providence — Barrington boundary line and the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence northerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to Mink St; thence southerly on Mink St to Wampanoag Trl; thence southerly on Wampanoag Trl to Socony Rd; thence westerly on Socony Rd to census block 440070105024012; thence southwesterly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440070105024012 to census block 440070105024016; thence southerly on the western boundary line of census block 440070105024016 to Willett Ave; thence southeasterly on Willett Ave to Crescent View Ave; thence southwesterly on Crescent View Ave to Bullocks Cove; thence southerly on the shoreline to the East Providence — Barrington boundary line; thence northeasterly on the East Providence — Barrington boundary line to the point of origin.

Sixty-seventh district:
The sixty-seventh representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Barrington bounded by a line beginning at Hundred Acre Cove and the East Providence — Barrington boundary line; thence northeasterly on the East Providence — Barrington boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the Barrington — Warren boundary line; thence southerly on the Barrington — Warren boundary line to Rumstick Point; thence northwesterly on the shoreline to the line extending from Watson Ave; thence northerly on line extending from Watson Ave to Watson Ave; thence northerly on Watson Ave to Nayatt Rd; thence easterly on Nayatt Rd to Rumstick Rd; thence southerly on Rumstick Rd to Ferry Ln; thence easterly on Ferry Ln to Owings Stone Rd; thence northerly on Owings Stone Rd to Mathewson Ln; thence northerly on Mathewson Ln to Mathewson Rd; thence northerly on Mathewson Rd to County Rd; thence northwesterly on County Rd to Maple Ave; thence westerly on Maple Ave to Centennial Ave; thence northerly on Centennial Ave to Foote St; thence easterly on Foote St to Princes Hill Ave; thence northerly on Princes Hill Ave to County Rd; thence northwesterly on County Rd to Massasoit Ave; thence easterly on Massasoit Ave to the Barrington River; thence northwesterly on the Barrington River to Hundred Acre Cove; thence northerly on Hundred Acre Cove to the point of origin.

The sixty-seventh representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Warren bounded by a line beginning at Child St and Metacom Ave; thence southerly on Metacom Ave to Patterson Ave; thence easterly on Patterson Ave and it’s extension to the Kickemuit River; thence southerly on the Kickemuit River to the Warren — Bristol boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Warren — Bristol boundary line to the Warren — Tiverton boundary line; thence northerly on the Warren — Tiverton boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the Barrington — Warren boundary line; thence southerly on the Barrington — Warren line to Main St; thence southeasterly on Main St to Water St; thence southerly on Water St to Miller St; thence easterly on Miller St to Main St; thence southerly on Main St to Child St; thence easterly on Child St to the point of origin.

Sixty-eighth district:
The sixty-eighth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Bristol bounded by a line beginning at Michael Dr and Metacom Ave; thence southerly on Metacom Ave to Chestnut St; thence westerly on Chestnut St to Sherry Ave; thence southerly on Sherry Ave to Perry St; thence westerly on Perry St to Thompson Ave; thence southerly on Thompson Ave to Bay View Ave; thence westerly on Bay View Ave to Wood St; thence southerly on Wood St to State St; thence westerly on State St and its extension to Bristol Harbor; thence southerly on Bristol Harbor to the Bristol — Portsmouth boundary line; thence westerly and northerly on the Bristol — Portsmouth boundary line to the Barrington — Bristol boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Barrington — Bristol boundary line to the Warren — Bristol boundary line; thence easterly and southerly on the Warren — Bristol boundary line to census block 440010309011011 and the line extending from Smith St; thence northerly and westerly on the northern boundary line of census block 440010309011011 to Christopher Dr; thence southerly on Christopher Dr to Michael Dr; thence westerly on Michael Dr to the point of origin.

The sixty-eighth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Warren bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Child St and the Kickemuit River; thence southerly on the Kickemuit River to the Warren — Bristol boundary line; thence westerly on the Warren — Bristol boundary line to the Barrington — Warren — Bristol boundary line; thence northerly on the Barrington — Warren boundary line to Main St; thence southeasterly on Main St to Water St; thence southerly on Water St to Miller St; thence easterly on Miller St to Main St; thence southerly on Main St to Child St; thence easterly on Child St to the point of origin.

Sixty-ninth district:
The sixty-ninth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Bristol bounded by a line beginning at Michael Dr and Metacom Ave; thence southerly on Metacom Ave to Chestnut St; thence westerly on Chestnut St to Sherry Ave; thence southerly on Sherry Ave to Perry St; thence westerly on Perry St to Thompson Ave; thence southerly on Thompson Ave to Bay View Ave; thence westerly on Bay View Ave to Wood St; thence southerly on Wood St to State St; thence westerly on State St and its extension to Bristol Harbor; thence southerly on Bristol Harbor to the Bristol — Portsmouth boundary line; thence easterly on the Bristol — Portsmouth boundary line to the Bristol — Tiverton boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Bristol — Tiverton boundary line to the Bristol — Warren boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Bristol — Warren boundary line to census block 440010309011000 and the line extending from Smith St; thence northerly and westerly on the northern boundary line of census block 440010309011011 to Christopher Dr; thence southerly on Christopher Dr to Michael Dr; thence westerly on Michael Dr point of origin.

The sixty-ninth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of Portsmouth known as Prudence Island; Patience Island; Hog Island; Hope Island; Gooseberry Island; Dyer Island and Despair Island.

Seventieth district:
The seventieth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Tiverton bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and State Route 24; thence easterly and southerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to Narrow Ave; thence westerly on Narrow Ave to Crandall Rd; thence southerly on Crandall Rd to census block 440050417022006; thence southwesterly on the northern boundary lines of census blocks 440050417022006 and 440050417022005 to Lake Rd; thence southerly on Lake Rd to East Rd; thence westerly on East Rd to Puncatest Neck Rd; thence westerly on Puncatest Neck Rd to Seapowet Ave; thence northerly on Seapowet Ave to Inlet Dr; thence northerly on Inlet Dr and its extension to the Sakonnet River and the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line; thence northerly on the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line to the Warren — Tiverton boundary line; thence northerly on the Warren — Tiverton boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

Seventy-first district:
The seventy-first representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Portsmouth bounded by a line beginning at E Main Rd and Hedly St; thence westerly on Hedly St to W Main Rd; thence southerly on W Main Rd to King Charles Dr; thence northwesterly on King Charles Dr to Thayer Dr; thence northerly on Thayer Dr to census block 440050401053023; thence westerly between census blocks 440050401053023 — 440050401053028 to railroad tracks; thence southerly along railroad tracks to census block 440050401041002; thence westerly between census blocks 440050401041002 — 440050401053022 extending to the shoreline; thence northerly along the shoreline to the Mount Hope Bridge; thence westerly on the Mount Hope Bridge to the Bristol — Portsmouth boundary line; thence northerly on the Bristol — Portsmouth boundary line to the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line; thence southeasterly and southerly on the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line to the line extending from the boundary line between census blocks 440050401023038 — 440050401023039; thence westerly on the southern boundary lines of census blocks 440050401023039, 440050401023045, and 440050401023052 to E Main Rd; thence northerly on East Main Rd to the point of origin.

The seventy-first representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Portsmouth known as Gould Island.

The seventy-first representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Tiverton bounded by a line beginning at the Massachusetts — Rhode Island boundary line and Narrow Ave; thence westerly on Narrow Ave to Crandall Rd; thence southerly on Crandall Rd to census block 440050417022006; thence southwesterly on the northern boundary line of census blocks 440050417022006 and 440050417022005 to Lake Rd; thence southerly on Lake Rd to East Rd; thence westerly on East Rd to Puncatest Neck Rd; thence westerly on Puncatest Neck Rd to Seapowet Ave; thence northerly on Seapowet Ave to Inlet Dr; thence northerly on Inlet Dr and its extension to the Sakonnet River and the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line; thence southerly on the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line to the Tiverton — Little Compton boundary line; thence easterly on the Tiverton — Little Compton boundary line to the Massachusetts — Rhode Island boundary line; thence northerly on the Massachusetts — Rhode Island boundary line to the point of origin.

The seventy-first representative district shall also consist of all the town of Little Compton.

Seventy-second district:
The seventy-second representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Portsmouth bounded by a line beginning at E Main Rd and Hedly St; thence westerly on Hedly St to W Main Rd; thence southerly on W Main Rd to King Charles Dr; thence northwesterly on King Charles Dr to Thayer Dr; thence northerly on Thayer Dr to census block 440050401053023; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440050401053023 — 440050401053028 to the railroad tracks; thence southerly on the railroad tracks to census block 440050401041002; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440050401041002 — 440050401053022 extending to the shoreline; thence southerly on the shoreline to the Middletown — Portsmouth boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Middletown — Portsmouth boundary line to the Portsmouth — Little Compton boundary line; thence northerly on the Portsmouth — Little Compton border line to the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line; thence northerly on the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line to the line extending from the boundary line between census blocks 440050401023038 — 440050401023039; thence westerly on the southern boundary lines of census blocks 440050401023039, 440050401023045, and 440050401023052 to E Main Rd; thence northerly on E Main Rd to the point of origin.

The seventy-second representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Middletown bounded by a line beginning at the Portsmouth — Middletown boundary line and E Main Rd; thence southwesterly on E Main Rd to Aquidneck Ave; thence southerly on Aquidneck Ave to Wolcott Ave; thence southerly on Wolcott Ave to Reservoir Rd; thence westerly on Reservoir Rd and the line extending from the Middletown — Newport boundary line; thence southerly on the Middletown — Newport boundary line to the Atlantic Ocean and the Middletown — Little Compton boundary line; thence northerly on the Middletown — Little Compton boundary line to the Portsmouth — Middletown boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Portsmouth — Middletown boundary line to the point of origin.

Seventy-third district:
The seventy-third representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Middletown bounded by a line beginning at the Middletown — Newport boundary line and the separation between Eastons North Pond and South Pond; thence easterly on the separation of North and South Pond on the boundary line between census blocks 440050404002039 — 440050404002038 and 440050404002039 — 440050404002036 to Aquidneck Ave; thence northerly on Aquidneck Ave to Reservoir Rd; thence easterly on Reservoir Rd to Wolcott Ave; thence northerly on Wolcott Ave to Aquidneck Ave; thence northerly on Aquidneck Ave to census block 440050404002014; thence southwesterly on the unnamed stream on the boundary line between census blocks 440050404002014 and 440050404002012 to Valley Rd; thence southerly on Valley Rd to Green End Ave; thence westerly on Green End Ave to Bailey Brook; thence northerly on Bailey Brook to the point extending from Adelaide Ave; thence westerly on Adelaide Ave to Boulevard; thence westerly on Boulevard to W Main Rd; thence northerly on W Main Rd to census block 440050402001013; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440050402001012 — 440050402001013, 440050402001012 — 440050402001001 and 440050402001012 — 440050402001003 to Lexington St; thence southerly on Lexington St to Coddington Highway; thence westerly on Coddington Highway to the Middletown — Newport boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Middletown — Newport boundary line to the point of origin.

The seventy-third representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Newport bounded by a line beginning at the Newport — Jamestown boundary line and the Newport Bridge; thence easterly on the Newport Bridge to State Highway 138; thence easterly on State Highway 138 to the Conrail RR; thence southerly on the Conrail RR to Van Zandt Ave; thence easterly on Van Zandt Ave to Tilley Ave; thence southerly on Tilley Ave to Gould St; thence southerly on Gould St to Broadway; thence northerly on Broadway to Cranston Ave; thence easterly on Cranston Ave to Kay St; thence northerly on Kay St to Prairie Ave; thence southerly on Prairie Ave to Ellery Rd; thence easterly on Ellery Rd to Eastons South Pond; thence southerly and easterly around the shoreline to the Middletown — Newport boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Middletown — Newport boundary line to the Newport — Jamestown boundary line; thence southerly on the Newport — Jamestown boundary line to the point of origin.

The seventy-third representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Newport known as Coasters Harbor Island (U.S. Naval Station).

Seventy-fourth district:
The seventy-fourth representative district shall consist of all of the town of Jamestown.

The seventy-fourth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Middletown bounded by a line beginning at the Portsmouth — Middletown boundary line and E Main Rd; thence southerly on E Main Rd to Aquidneck Ave; thence southerly on Aquidneck Ave to census block 440050404002014; thence southwesterly on the unnamed stream on the western boundary line of census blocks 440050404002014 and 440050404002012 to Valley Rd; thence southerly on Valley Rd to Green End Ave; thence westerly on Green End Ave to Bailey Brook; thence northerly on Bailey Brook to the point extending from Adelaide Ave; thence westerly on Adelaide Ave to Boulevard; thence westerly on Boulevard to W Main Rd; thence northerly on W Main Rd to census block 440050402001013; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440050402001012 — 440050402001013, 440050402001012 — 440050402001001 and 440050402001012 — 440050402001003 to Lexington St; thence southerly on Lexington St to Coddington Highway; thence westerly on Coddington Highway to the Middletown — Newport boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Middletown — Newport boundary line to the Jamestown — Newport boundary line; thence northerly on the Jamestown — Newport boundary line to the Portsmouth — Middletown boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Portsmouth — Middletown boundary line to the point of origin.

Seventy-fifth district:
The seventy-fifth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Newport bounded by a line beginning at the Newport — Jamestown boundary line and the Newport Bridge; thence easterly on the Newport Bridge to State Highway 138; thence easterly on State Highway 138 to the Conrail RR; thence southerly on the Conrail RR to Van Zandt Ave; thence easterly on Van Zandt Ave to Tilley Ave; thence southerly on Tilley Ave to Gould St; thence southerly on Gould St to Broadway; thence northerly on Broadway to Cranston Ave; thence easterly on Cranston Ave to Kay St; thence northerly on Kay St to Prairie Ave; thence southerly on Prairie Ave to Ellery Rd; thence easterly on Ellery Rd to Eastons South Pond; thence southerly and easterly around the shoreline to the Middletown — Newport boundary line; thence southerly on the Middletown — Newport boundary line to the Atlantic Ocean; thence westerly and southerly on the Newport boundary line to the Jamestown — Newport boundary line; thence northerly on the Jamestown — Newport boundary line to the point of origin.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 5, § 7, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 6, § 7, effective February 16, 2022.